Washington statutes.
RCW 11.42.085

Property liable for claims—Payment limits.

(1) The decedent's nonprobate and probate assets that were subject to the satisfaction of the decedent's general liabilities immediately before the decedent's death are liable for claims. The decedent's probate assets may be liable, whether or not there is a probate administration of the decedent's estate.

(2) The notice agent may pay a claim allowed by the notice agent or a judgment on a claim first prosecuted against a notice agent only out of assets received as a result of the death of the decedent by the notice agent or by those appointing the notice agent, except as may be provided by agreement under RCW 11.96A.220 or by court order issued in a judicial proceeding under RCW 11.96A.080.

[ 1999 c 42 s 611; 1997 c 252 s 32.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1999 c 42: See RCW 11.96A.902.

Application—1997 c 252 ss 1-73: See note following RCW 11.02.005.